Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Improvement of Public Drinking Water Supplies

151.630.
Legislative finding — Cabinet’s duty to administer system capacity program — Authority to promulgate administrative regulations.

The General Assembly finds that the Federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended by Public Law 104-182, creates an opportunity for Kentucky to improve public drinking water supplies. Therefore, the cabinet shall administer a system capacity program for public water systems consistent with the federal law. For purposes of KRS 151.630 to 151.636, “system capacity” means the technical, financial, and managerial capacity to operate a public water system in compliance with the Federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended by Public Law 104-182. The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations as necessary to administer KRS 151.630 to 151.636.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 311, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

151.632.
System capacity development strategy — Assistance to existing systems in plan development.

Not later than August 6, 2000, the cabinet shall develop and begin implementing, a strategy to assist public water systems in acquiring and maintaining technical, financial, and managerial system capacity.

In preparing the system capacity development strategy, the cabinet shall solicit and consider public comment on, and incorporate into the strategy as appropriate:

The methods or criteria that the cabinet will use to identify and prioritize public water systems most in need of improving technical, financial, and managerial capacity;

A description of the institutional, regulatory, financial, tax, or legal factors at the federal, state, or local level that encourage or impair system capacity development;

A description of how the cabinet will use the authorities and resources of the Safe Drinking Water Act as amended by PL 104-182, or other means, to assist public water systems in complying with national primary drinking water regulations, to encourage the development of partnerships between public water systems to enhance the system capacity of public water systems, and to assist public water systems in the training and certification of operators;

A description of how the cabinet will establish a baseline against which to measure improvements in system capacity with respect to national primary drinking water regulations, this chapter, KRS 224.10-110, and administrative regulations promulgated thereunder; and

An identification of the persons that have an interest in and are involved in the development and implementation of the system capacity development strategy, including all appropriate agencies of federal, state, and local governments, private and nonprofit public water systems, and public water system customers.

If the cabinet determines that an existing public water system does not have system capacity, it may assist the public water system in submitting a system capacity development plan as part of the long range water supply plan required by KRS 151.114. The plan shall contain timetables, goals, and funding sources necessary for the public water system to achieve system capacity.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 311, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

151.634.
Requirement for system capacity for new community or nontransient noncommunity public water systems after October 1, 1999.

After October 1, 1999, new community or nontransient noncommunity public water systems, as defined by federal law, shall not be created unless they have system capacity. For new community or nontransient noncommunity public water systems that intend to begin operating after October 1, 1999, the cabinet shall not approve plans pursuant to KRS 224.10-110 and the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, unless the systems demonstrate to the cabinet that they have system capacity.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 311, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

151.636.
Cabinet’s requirement to conduct a source water assessment and delineation program.

The cabinet shall conduct a source water assessment and delineation program as described in the 1996 amendments to the Federal Safe Drinking Water Act, Public Law 104-182.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 311, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.